Washington statutes.
RCW 11.120.080

Disclosure of other digital assets of deceased user.

Unless the user prohibited disclosure of digital assets or the court directs otherwise, a custodian shall disclose to the personal representative of the estate of a deceased user a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the user and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications of the user, if the representative gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

(2) A certified copy of the death certificate of the user;

(3) A certified copy of the letter of appointment of the representative, or a small estate affidavit or court order; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(a) A number, user name, or address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the user's account;

(b) Evidence linking the account to the user;

(c) An affidavit stating that disclosure of the user's digital assets is reasonably necessary for administration of the estate; or

(d) A finding by the court that:

(i) The user had a specific account with the custodian, identifiable by the information specified in (a) of this subsection; or

(ii) Disclosure of the user's digital assets is reasonably necessary for administration of the estate.

[ 2016 c 140 s 8.]